Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-196.02
Board of Parole; decisions regarding parole; considerations.

When making decisions regarding parole, the board shall consider information and reports provided by the Reentry Continuity Advisory Board created under section 47-1117.

Laws 2024, LB631, § 40.
July 19, 2024